Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1877.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62W.16] RESPONSIBILITY TO USE COMPENSATION FOR BENEFIT OF COVERED PERSONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Compensation used to reduce point-of-sale costs. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), a pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier must remit all compensation received from a drug manufacturer related to its prescription drug benefit directly to the covered person associated with a particular prescription drug, at the point of sale, to reduce the covered person's out-of-pocket cost for that prescription drug. new text end new text begin (b) A pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier is not required to remit all compensation as required by paragraph (a), if the covered person's cost-sharing obligation for a particular drug is less than what the person's out-of-pocket cost for that drug would be after application of paragraph (a). All compensation retained by the pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier under this paragraph must be applied by that entity in its plan design to offset future premiums or costs for covered persons. new text end new text begin (c) State employee group insurance program contracts with pharmacy benefit managers, including but not limited to contracts under section 43A.231, must require pharmacy benefit manager compliance with this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply. new text end new text begin (b) "Compensation" means any direct or indirect financial benefit, including but not limited to rebates, discounts, credits, fees, grants, chargebacks, or other payments or benefits of any kind. new text end new text begin (c) "Cost-sharing obligation" means a covered person's co-payment or coinsurance for a particular prescription drug. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Report on compliance. new text end new text begin Beginning March 1, 2026, and each March 1 thereafter, a pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier shall file with the commissioner a report, in the form and manner specified by the commissioner, demonstrating how the pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier has complied with this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exception. new text end new text begin This section does not apply to a pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier if the covered person's cost-sharing obligation is equal to or less than: new text end new text begin (1) $25 for a generic drug; and new text end new text begin (2) $55 for a brand name drug. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end